Hawaii statutes.
[§98-9] Standards. In implementing
this chapter, an official publisher of legal material in an electronic record
shall consider:

(1) Standards and practices of other jurisdictions;

(2) The most recent standards regarding
authentication of, preservation and security of, and public access to, legal
material in an electronic record and other electronic records, as promulgated
by national standard-setting bodies;

(3) The needs of users of legal material in an
electronic record;

(4) The views of governmental officials and entities
and other interested persons; and

(5) To the extent practicable, methods and
technologies for the authentication of, preservation and security of, and
public access to, legal material that are compatible with the methods and technologies
used by other official publishers in this State and in other states that have
adopted a law substantially similar to this chapter. [L 2013, c 11, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next